Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-143
Compensation; death benefits; absence of qualified administrator; payment; to whom made.

In case of death, where no executor or administrator is qualified, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall, by order, direct payment to be made to such person as would be appointed administrator of the estate of such decedent, upon like terms as to bond for the proper application of compensation payments as are required of administrators.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 44, p. 598;

R.S.1913, § 3685;

C.S.1922, § 3067;

C.S.1929, § 48-144;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 29, p. 202;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-144;

R.S.1943, § 48-143;

Laws 1975, LB 187, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 61.

Action for compensation by injured employee, pending at his death, may be revived by dependents giving bond or by administrator without bond. Palmer v. Saunders County, 117 Neb. 484, 221 N.W. 99 (1928).

Action to recover compensation for death may be brought either by dependents, legal guardian or trustee of minor dependent, or executor or administrator of deceased. Coster v. Thompson Hotel Co., 102 Neb. 585, 168 N.W. 191 (1918).